Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1947
Termination, expulsion, and suspension.

(a) No member of a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or memberships in such corporations may be terminated or suspended except pursuant to a procedure that is fair and reasonable and is carried out in good faith.

(b) A procedure is fair and reasonable when either:

(1) The articles or bylaws set forth a procedure that provides:

(i) Not less than fifteen days' prior written notice of the expulsion, suspension, or termination and the reasons therefor; and

(ii) An opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination by a person or persons authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, suspension, or termination not take place; or

(2) It is fair and reasonable taking into consideration all of the relevant facts and circumstances.

(c) Any written notice given by mail must be given by first-class or certified mail sent to the last-known address of the member shown on the corporation's records.

(d) Any proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension, or termination, including a proceeding in which defective notice is alleged, must be commenced within one year after the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination.

(e) A member who has been expelled or suspended may be liable to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made prior to expulsion or suspension.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 47.